Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1588.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(b) “Program” means, unless the context requires otherwise, an electric company’s pro-
posed or approved inclusive utility investment program.
(c) “Project” includes energy efficiency upgrades, renewable energy projects or any
combination thereof.
(2) Each electric company shall develop and file with the Public Utility Commission an
inclusive utility investment program that is consistent with the provisions of this section.
Under an inclusive utility investment program, an electric company shall offer to pay for
qualifying energy efficiency upgrades or renewable energy projects at the property sites of
the electric company’s customers. In return, the electric company shall be entitled to re-
cover the purchase and installation costs for a project at a customer’s property site through
an additional fixed, site-specific charge on the customer’s utility bill.
(3) The types of energy efficiency upgrades or renewable energy projects that qualify for
financing under an inclusive utility investment program must include, but are not limited to,
the following:
(a) Energy efficiency upgrades that are not related to the use of fossil fuels;
(b) Electric heat pumps;
(c) Energy storage systems;
(d) Demand response equipment;
(e) Solar photovoltaic energy systems;
(f) Solar thermal energy systems; and
(g) Any ancillary equipment or upgrades necessary to complete the installation of a
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 123

SB 1588
qualifying project.
(4) A customer’s participation in an inclusive utility investment program is voluntary.
Any customer who owns a property site or is a tenant and has permission from the owner
of the property site to participate in the program shall be allowed to participate in the pro-
gram.
(5)(a) An inclusive utility investment program must provide a participating customer
with immediate and ongoing savings relative to the customer’s baseline electricity or energy
utility costs. The amount charged for financing energy efficiency upgrades or renewable
energy projects at a customer’s property site must be less than the estimated savings re-
flected in the reduction in the customer’s electricity or energy utility costs.
(b) A participating customer may not be required to make an upfront payment. However,
a customer may pay down the costs of a project if by paying down the costs, the project
qualifies for financing through the estimated savings reflected in the reduction in the
customer’s electricity or energy utility costs. Any payments made by a customer to pay
down the costs of a project must be made to the installing contractor.
(c) A participating customer may pay for a project through an additional fixed, site-
specific charge on the customer’s utility bill or by using a third-party structured payment
arrangement.
(6) An inclusive utility investment program must:
(a) Be accessible to low-income customers and environmental justice communities;
(b) Ensure that participating customers use to the greatest extent possible all other
available financial incentives; and
(c) Include customer protection standards that are based on best practices.
(7) An inclusive utility investment program may:
(a) Connect participating customers with project vendors; and
(b) Prioritize project vendors that have a history of material compliance with state laws
and regulations or that participate in an apprenticeship program registered with the State
Apprenticeship and Training Council.
(8) In developing an inclusive utility investment program, an electric company shall:
(a) Address how the electric company plans to secure capital to fund qualifying projects.
An electric company may raise capital on its own or work with third-party lenders to secure
capital for participating customers. However, the electric company shall use a market
mechanism to identify the least costly source of capital funds for the purpose of passing on
the maximum amount of savings to participating customers.
(b) Guarantee that a program’s conservative estimates of financial savings will imme-
diately exceed program costs for participating customers.
(9) In implementing an inclusive utility investment program, an electric company shall:
(a) Coordinate with the entity designated by the commission to administer moneys col-
lected by an electric company through the public purpose charge described under ORS 757.612
and other energy efficiency incentives and program providers; and
(b) Integrate the electric company’s program with planning requirements that the elec-
tric company is required to carry out and other energy efficiency incentives and programs.
(10) The commission may:
(a) Establish minimum financial savings standards that must be realized relative to an
electric company’s program costs.
[2]

SB 1588
(b) Adopt and provide performance incentives based on the number and type of custom-
ers served or the number and type of projects completed by an electric company’s program.
(11) An electric company may recover prudent costs incurred in developing or imple-
menting an inclusive utility investment program that is approved by the commission.
SECTION 3. (1) In developing an inclusive utility investment program under section 2 of
this 2026 Act, an electric company shall:
(a) Review existing models and programs, including the Pay As You Save system devel-
oped by the Energy Efficiency Institute, Inc.
(b) Consult with the State Department of Energy, the entity designated by the Public
Utility Commission to administer moneys collected by an electric company through the
public purpose charge described under ORS 757.612 and utility equity advisory groups.
(2)(a) An electric company shall first file with the commission for the commission’s ap-
proval a proposed inclusive utility investment program under section 2 of this 2026 Act in the
next distribution system planning docket that commences after the effective date of this 2026
Act.
(b) If the commission approves an electric company’s proposed inclusive utility invest-
ment program, the program must be available to the electric company’s customers no later
than January 1, 2028.

[3]